Louisiana, session 2026, HB72.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1300.27 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1300.27. Gaming; local option election
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing
authority of each parish in the state is hereby authorized to call and conduct an
election on a proposition to allow the operation of any form of gaming previously
approved by the legislature which was not allowed in that parish on January 1, 2026.
B. The governing authority of each parish in this state may call, by ordinance
or resolution, an election on the proposition of whether to allow any of the following
forms of gaming, if that form of gaming was not allowed in that parish on January
1, 2026:
(1) Riverboat gaming, as permitted by Chapter 4 of Title 27 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) Horse racing, as permitted by Chapter 4 of Title 4 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-314 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 72
(3) Video draw poker, as permitted by Chapter 8 of Title 27 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
(4) Sports wagering, as permitted by Chapter 10 of Title 27 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
C. A governing authority of a parish that calls, by ordinance or resolution,
a proposition election pursuant to this Section shall provide for a separate
proposition on the ballot for each form of gaming so that electors may vote for or
against each form of gaming that appears on the ballot.
D. For each form of gaming that appears on the ballot, if a majority of
electors voting in the election vote in favor of that form of gaming, then that form
of gaming shall be allowed within that parish.
E. For each form of gaming that appears on the ballot, if a majority of
electors voting in the election vote not in favor of that form of gaming, then that
form of gaming shall not be allowed within that parish.
F. A governing authority that calls an election pursuant to this Section shall
not include on the ballot any form of gaming which was allowed in that parish on
January 1, 2026.
G. Elections called pursuant to this Section shall be held in compliance with
the Louisiana Election Code provisions governing proposition elections.
H. The costs of the election shall be paid by the governing authority that
calls the election.